Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,101.03
Decommissioned nuclear reactor; waste; storage or disposal; waste from outside region; acceptance.

(1) No low-level radioactive waste produced as a result of decommissioning a nuclear reactor shall be stored or disposed of at the facility until the department has determined that such facility is designed to safely store or dispose of such waste.

(2) Unless an emergency exists, no waste shall be accepted from outside the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact region without prior approval by the Legislature. No agreement entered into pursuant to an emergency situation shall extend beyond six months unless a continuation of the agreement is approved by the Legislature.

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 11.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.